Utah statutes.
53-7-225.   Times for sale and discharge of fireworks.

(1)  A person may sell Class C common state approved explosives in the state as follows:

(a)  beginning on June 23 and ending on July 27;

(b)  beginning on December 29 and ending on December 31; and

(c)  two days before and on the Chinese New Year's eve.

(2)  A person may discharge Class C common state approved explosives in the state as follows:

(a)  between the hours of 11 a.m. and 11 p.m., except that on July 4 and July 24, the hours are 11 a.m. to midnight:

(i)  beginning on July 1 and ending on July 7; and

(ii)  beginning on July 21 and ending on July 27;

(b) (i)  beginning at 11 a.m. on December 31 and ending at 1 a.m. on the following day; or

(ii)  if New Year's eve is on a Sunday and the local governmental jurisdiction determines to celebrate New Year's eve on the prior Saturday, then it is lawful to discharge Class C common state approved explosives on that prior Saturday; and

(c)  beginning at 11 a.m. on the Chinese New Year's eve and ending at 1 a.m. on the following day.

(3)  A person who violates the time restrictions stated in Subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c) is guilty of an infraction.

